South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4673.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 11, Chapter 3, Title 16 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 16-3-1093.    (A) For the purposes of this section: (1) "Dissemination" means electronically publishing, posting, or otherwise disclosing information to a public internet site or public forum; (2) "Household member" means a person who regularly resides in a household or who within the six months preceding the conduct of an offense contained in this section regularly resided in the household; (3) "Immediate family member" means a parent, grandparent, spouse, child, stepchild, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, sibling, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, or grandchild; and (4) "Personally identifying information" means information that identifies or reasonably can be used to identify an individual including, but not limited to: (a) Social Security number or other government-issued identifier; (b) date of birth; (c) home or physical address; (d) email address or telephone number; (e) financial account number, or credit or debit card number; (f) biometric, health, or medical data, or insurance information; or (g) school or employment locations. (B) A person is guilty of disseminating personally identifying information about an individual when, with the intent to intimidate, abuse, threaten, harass, or frighten an individual who resides in this State, he: (1) intentionally disseminates the personally identifying information of the individual or an individual's immediate family member or household member; and (2) the dissemination would cause a reasonable individual to be in fear of physical injury to himself, or to an immediate family member or a member of his household. (C) This section shall apply to electronic communications originating within or accessible within the State. (D) A person who disseminates personally identifying information: (1) that results in no physical injury to the victim is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be imprisoned not more than one year; (2) that results in physical injury to the victim or to a victim's immediate family member or household member, is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, must be imprisoned for not more than five years; (3) that results in great bodily injury to the victim or to the victim's immediate family member or household member is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, must be imprisoned not more than fifteen years; or (4) that results in the death of the victim or of the victim's immediate family member or household member is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, must be imprisoned not more than twenty-five years. (E) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose liability on a broadband internet access service provider, a telecommunications service provider, an interconnected VoIP provider, or a mobile service provider as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 153, a commercial mobile service provider as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 332(d), or a cable operator as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 522, when acting in its capacity as a provider of those services. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----